Maryland, session 2025, SB0958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–108.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CATASTROPHIC DAMAGE” MEANS THE LOSS OF 50%
OR MORE OF CROPS FROM A SINGLE FIELD.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT DEER HAVE CAUSED
CATASTROPHIC DAMAGE TO A FIELD, THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE THE USE
OF EXTRAORDINARY MEASURES TO REDUCE THE DEER POPULATION CAUSING THE
CATASTROPHIC DAMAGE.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0958*

SENATE BILL 958
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO USE EXTRAORDINARY MEASURES UNDER THIS SECTION TO REPORT TO THE
DEPARTMENT THE NUMBER OF DEER HARVESTED AT EACH LOCATION OF
CATASTROPHIC DAMAGE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.